src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! Noun inflection
!  ---------------
!! The Norwegian Bokmål language nouns inflect in cases.

LEXICON Cases
 +N+Sg+nom:0   #     ;
 +N+Pl+nom:i   #     ;
 +N+Sg+loc:as  #     ;
 +N+Pl+loc:ias #     ;
 +N+Sg+acc:at  #     ;
 +N+Pl+acc:iat #     ;
         #:0   Nouns ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
